Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department of  Geology and Mineral
Industries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Geological survey ...................... $ 7,154,908
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 2,000,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds for contract services,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received by the State Department  of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the following purposes:
(1) Geologic survey......................... $ 2,510,818
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 4,844,674
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,522,133 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2023
Act, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 2